Washington statutes.
RCW 41.56.907

School district collective bargaining agreements not altered or impaired—Compliance with chapter—2017 3rd sp.s. c 13.

Nothing in chapter 13, Laws of 2017 3rd sp. sess. is intended to alter or impair school district collective bargaining agreements that are in effect on October 19, 2017. Any school district collective bargaining agreement executed or modified after October 19, 2017, must comply with chapter 13, Laws of 2017 3rd sp. sess.

[ 2017 3rd sp.s. c 13 s 704.]

NOTES:

Intent—2017 3rd sp.s. c 13: See note following RCW 28A.150.410.